New York, session 2025-2026, S9504.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 294 of the laws of 2023 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the city of Poughkeepsie to impose a 3 hotel and motel tax is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 5 deemed repealed [3 years after such date] August 23, 2029. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14948-03-6